Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 3

Contracts Between Municipalities

7-35-301. Contracts authorized.

Municipalities to which this part may apply are authorized to contract with each other for the use by one (1) of the municipalities of the sewer or water pipes and system belonging to the other.

Acts 1897, ch. 76, § 1; Shan., § 1924a1; mod. Code 1932, § 3337; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1404.

Cross-References. Service contracts between cities or towns, §7-35-416.

7-35-302. Applicability of part — Consolidated systems.

This part shall apply to municipalities that adjoin one another, or that are in such proximity to one another as to make it of the interest to both that such system of each be in substance consolidated and unified, the question of the mutual advantages to accrue to such municipalities, respectively, to be determined by the municipalities, and their determination of the advantages by entering into such contract or contracts to be conclusive.

Acts 1897, ch. 76, § 2; Shan., § 1924a2; mod. Code 1932, § 3338; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1405.

Cross-References. Extension of service beyond corporate limits, §7-51-401.

7-35-303. Construction between contracting municipalities.

When such municipalities do not adjoin but lie in such proximity to one another as to make such contract to their mutual advantage, then either of the municipalities may, from the public funds of either of the municipalities, build such lines of main sewer or water pipes over the intermediate territory, using any streets, roads, or public ways for the sewers or water pipes that may be necessary, so as to enable the pipes and systems of the two (2) or more municipalities to be joined together and consolidated into one.

Acts 1897, ch. 76, § 3; Shan., § 1924a3; mod. Code 1932, § 3339; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1406.

Cross-References. Extension of service beyond corporate limits, §7-51-401.

7-35-304. Enforcement of contracts.

Any contract or contracts made by the municipalities under the authority conferred by this chapter shall be binding and obligatory upon the municipalities, respectively, and may be enforced against the municipalities, or either of the municipalities, as any other contract obligation might be enforced.

Acts 1897, ch. 76, § 4; Shan., § 1924a4; Code 1932, § 3340; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1407.